Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2418.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 468.27, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: b. (1) A county auditor who has not filed a document described in paragraph âaâ as a district parcel record with the county recorder before July 1, 2025, shall prepare and file the district parcel record on or before June 30, 2026 2027 . (2) This paragraph âbâ is repealed July 1, 2026 2027 . Senate File 2418, p. 2 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 2418, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor